Montana, session 2025, HB417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 3] may be cited as the "Montana Hunters
First Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Nonresident hunting impact study. (1) The department shall conduct a
study of nonresident impacts on deer and elk hunting in the state and in each of the commission's
administrative regions.
(2) The study must utilize a range of data, including but not limited to hunter days, harvest
reporting, use of lands that are part of hunting access programs, hunting pressure on public lands, elk and deer
population trends, and licensing.
(3) Upon completion of the study, the department shall publish a report that is accessible to the
public. The report must include:
(a) a comprehensive assessment of the data as it relates to nonresident impacts on deer and elk
hunting in the state and in each of the commission's administrative regions;
(b) specific information about the methods used for collecting or acquiring data used in the report;
and
(c) the identification of specific issues for consideration by the legislature, department, and
commission concerning nonresident impacts on deer and elk hunting.
(4) The study and report must be completed by December 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Mandatory reporting of hunting activity -- rulemaking. (1) A person
who is issued a hunting license for a game animal as defined in 87-2-101 shall report to the department all of
the person's hunting activity for each animal.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 417

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 417.1
(2) A person shall report all of the person's hunting activity for a game animal before the person is
eligible to purchase a new game animal hunting license in the following license year.
(3) The department may make rules to implement this section, including but not limited to reporting
systems, deadlines, and penalties.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. (1) [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 87, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 1, part 2, apply
to [sections 1 and 2].
(2) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 87, chapter 2, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 87, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 3].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective dates. (1) [Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, and 6] are effective on passage
and approval.
(2) [Section 3] is effective March 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Termination. [Section 2] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 417